Ohio, session 136, SB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5501.60 of the Revised Code is 5
hereby repealed. 6
Section 2. (A) The Director of Transportation, in 7
consultation with the Northeast Ohio Areawide Coordinating 8
Agency, shall conduct a study to develop a traffic congestion 9
management strategic plan. However, at the Director's 10
discretion, the Northeast Ohio Areawide Coordinating Agency may 11
lead the study. The study shall examine the area along 12
Interstate Route 71 between the following boundaries: 13
(1) To the north, U.S. Route 42; 14
(2) To the south, State Route 303; 15
(3) To the west, U.S. Route 42; 16
(4) To the east, West 130th Street. 17

S. B. No. 31 Page 2
As Introduced
(B)(1) Not later than December 31, 2026, the Director or, 18
as applicable, the Northeast Ohio Areawide Coordinating Agency 19
shall complete the study and submit a report of the study's 20
findings to all of the following: 21
(a) The Governor; 22
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives; 23
(c) The President of the Senate; 24
(d) The chairpersons of the committees of the House of 25
Representatives and the Senate pertaining to transportation; 26
(e) The chief executive officer and the legislative 27
authority of the municipal corporations of Strongsville, North 28
Royalton, and Brunswick. 29
(2) The Director or, as applicable, the Northeast Ohio 30
Areawide Coordinating Agency may include in the report solutions 31
to mitigate and strategically manage any traffic congestion 32
concerns found during the study. 33